Nebraska, session 109, LB65.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Court costs and fees described in subsection (2) of
this section shall not be assessed against:
(a) A juvenile or the juvenile's parent or guardian in any
proceeding under the Nebraska Juvenile Code under subdivision (1), (2),
or (3)(b) of section 43-247; or
(b) A defendant in a criminal proceeding, for an offense other than
a traffic misdemeanor or infraction, which was alleged to have been
committed when such defendant was under nineteen years of age, or such
defendant's parent or guardian.
(2) This section applies to court costs and fees, including, but not
limited to, docket or filing fees, appeal bonds or deposits, witness
fees, mileage fees, program participation fees, and probation fees, and
includes, but is not limited to, any such court costs or fees imposed
under any of the following sections: Section 24-703, 25-1140.09, 25-1914,
25-3010, 29-1903, 29-2207, 29-2262, 29-2262.04, 29-2262.06, 29-2704,
29-4106, 29-4121, 33-103, 33-106, 33-107.01, 33-107.03, 33-124,
33-126.05, 33-154, 33-155, 33-156, 33-157, 47-633, or 81-1429.
(3) This section does not apply to bail bonds, costs, or fees
described in section 29-901 or subsection (5) of section 43-253.
Sec. 2. Section 24-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
24-703 (1) Each original member shall contribute monthly four
percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund until the maximum
benefit as limited in subsection (1) of section 24-710 has been earned.
It shall be the duty of the Director of Administrative Services in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section to make a deduction of
four percent on the monthly payroll of each original member who is a
judge of the Supreme Court, a judge of the Court of Appeals, a judge of
the district court, a judge of a separate juvenile court, a judge of the
county court, a clerk magistrate of the county court who was an associate
county judge and a member of the fund at the time of his or her
-2-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
appointment as a clerk magistrate, or a judge of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court showing the amount to be deducted and its credit to
the fund. The Director of Administrative Services and the State Treasurer
shall credit the four percent as shown on the payroll and the amounts
received from the various counties to the fund and remit the same to the
director in charge of the judges retirement system who shall keep an
accurate record of the contributions of each judge.
(2)(a) In addition to the contribution required under subdivision
(c) of this subsection, beginning on July 1, 2004, each future member who
became a member prior to July 1, 2015, and who has not elected to make
contributions and receive benefits as provided in section 24-703.03 shall
contribute monthly six percent of his or her monthly compensation to the
fund until the maximum benefit as limited in subsection (2) of section
24-710 has been earned. After the maximum benefit as limited in
subsection (2) of section 24-710 has been earned, such future member
shall make no further contributions to the fund, except that (i) any time
the maximum benefit is changed, a future member who has previously earned
the maximum benefit as it existed prior to the change shall contribute
monthly six percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund until
the maximum benefit as changed and as limited in subsection (2) of
section 24-710 has been earned and (ii) such future member shall continue
to make the contribution required under subdivision (c) of this
subsection.
(b) In addition to the contribution required under subdivision (c)
of this subsection, beginning on July 1, 2004, a judge who became a
member prior to July 1, 2015, and who first serves as a judge on or after
July 1, 2004, or a future member who became a member prior to July 1,
2015, and who elects to make contributions and receive benefits as
provided in section 24-703.03 shall contribute monthly eight percent of
his or her monthly compensation to the fund until the maximum benefit as
limited by subsection (2) of section 24-710 has been earned. In addition
-3-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
to the contribution required under subdivision (c) of this subsection,
after the maximum benefit as limited in subsection (2) of section 24-710
has been earned, such judge or future member shall contribute monthly
four percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund for the
remainder of his or her active service.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2009, a member or judge described in
subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection shall contribute monthly an
additional one percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2015, a judge who first serves as a judge
on or after such date shall contribute monthly ten percent of his or her
monthly compensation to the fund.
(e) It shall be the duty of the Director of Administrative Services
to make a deduction on the monthly payroll of each such future member who
is a judge of the Supreme Court, a judge of the Court of Appeals, a judge
of the district court, a judge of a separate juvenile court, a judge of
the county court, a clerk magistrate of the county court who was an
associate county judge and a member of the fund at the time of his or her
appointment as a clerk magistrate, or a judge of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court showing the amount to be deducted and its credit to
the fund. This shall be done each month. The Director of Administrative
Services and the State Treasurer shall credit the amount as shown on the
payroll and the amounts received from the various counties to the fund
and remit the same to the director in charge of the judges retirement
system who shall keep an accurate record of the contributions of each
judge.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and section 1
of this act, a Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges fee of six dollars
through June 30, 2021, eight dollars beginning July 1, 2021, through June
30, 2022, nine dollars beginning July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023, ten
dollars beginning July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, eleven dollars
beginning July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, and twelve dollars
-4-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
beginning July 1, 2025, shall be taxed as costs in each (i) civil cause
of action, criminal cause of action, traffic misdemeanor or infraction,
and city or village ordinance violation filed in the district courts, the
county courts, and the separate juvenile courts, (ii) filing in the
district court of an order, award, or judgment of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court or any judge thereof pursuant to section 48-188, (iii)
appeal or other proceeding filed in the Court of Appeals, and (iv)
original action, appeal, or other proceeding filed in the Supreme Court.
In county courts a sum shall be charged which is equal to ten percent of
each fee provided by sections 33-125, 33-126.02, 33-126.03, and
33-126.06, rounded to the nearest even dollar. No judges retirement fee
shall be charged for filing a report pursuant to sections 33-126.02 and
33-126.06.
(b) The fee increases described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection shall not be taxed as a cost in any criminal cause of action,
traffic misdemeanor or infraction, or city or village ordinance violation
filed in the district court or the county court. The fee on such criminal
causes of action, traffic misdemeanors or infractions, or city or village
ordinance violations shall remain six dollars on and after July 1, 2021.
(c) When collected by the clerk of the district or county court,
such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer within ten days after
the close of each calendar month for credit to the Nebraska Retirement
Fund for Judges. In addition, information regarding collection of court
fees shall be submitted to the director in charge of the judges
retirement system by the State Court Administrator within ten days after
the close of each calendar month.
(d) The board may charge a late administrative processing fee not to
exceed twenty-five dollars if the information is not timely received or
the money is delinquent. In addition, the board may charge a late fee of
thirty-eight thousandths of one percent of the amount required to be
submitted pursuant to this section for each day such amount has not been
-5-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
received. Such late fees shall be remitted to the director who shall
promptly thereafter remit such fees to the State Treasurer for credit to
the fund.
(e) No Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges fee which is
uncollectible for any reason shall be waived by a county judge as
provided in section 29-2709.
(4) All expenditures from the fund shall be authorized by voucher in
the manner prescribed in section 24-713. The fund shall be used for the
payment of all annuities and other benefits to members and their
beneficiaries and for the expenses of administration.
(5)(a) Prior to July 1, 2021:
(i) Beginning July 1, 2013, and each fiscal year thereafter, the
board shall cause an annual actuarial valuation to be performed that will
value the plan assets for the year and ascertain the contributions
required for such fiscal year. The actuary for the board shall perform an
actuarial valuation of the system on the basis of actuarial assumptions
recommended by the actuary, approved by the board, and kept on file with
the board using the entry age actuarial cost method. Under this method,
the actuarially required funding rate is equal to the normal cost rate,
plus the contribution rate necessary to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability on a level percentage of salary basis. The normal cost
under this method shall be determined for each individual member on a
level percentage of salary basis. The normal cost amount is then summed
for all members;
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2006, any existing unfunded liabilities shall
be reinitialized and amortized over a thirty-year period, and during each
subsequent actuarial valuation through June 30, 2021, changes in the
unfunded actuarial accrued liability due to changes in benefits,
actuarial assumptions, the asset valuation method, or actuarial gains or
losses shall be measured and amortized over a thirty-year period
beginning on the valuation date of such change;
-6-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(iii) If the unfunded actuarial accrued liability under the entry
age actuarial cost method is zero or less than zero on an actuarial
valuation date, then all prior unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities
shall be considered fully funded and the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability shall be reinitialized and amortized over a thirty-year period
as of the actuarial valuation date; and
(iv) If the actuarially required contribution rate exceeds the rate
of all contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act,
there shall be a supplemental appropriation sufficient to pay for the
differences between the actuarially required contribution rate and the
rate of all contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act.
(5)(a) (b) Beginning July 1, 2021, and each fiscal year thereafter:
(i) The board shall cause an annual actuarial valuation to be
performed that will value the plan assets for the year and ascertain the
contributions required for such fiscal year. The actuary for the board
shall perform an actuarial valuation of the system on the basis of
actuarial assumptions recommended by the actuary, approved by the board,
and kept on file with the board using the entry age actuarial cost
method. Under such method, the actuarially required funding rate is equal
to the normal cost rate, plus the contribution rate necessary to amortize
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability on a level percentage of salary
basis. The normal cost under such method shall be determined for each
individual member on a level percentage of salary basis. The normal cost
amount is then summed for all members;
(ii) Any changes in the unfunded actuarial accrued liability due to
changes in benefits, actuarial assumptions, the asset valuation method,
or actuarial gains or losses shall be measured and amortized over a
twenty-five-year period beginning on the valuation date of such change;
(iii) If the unfunded actuarial accrued liability under the entry
age actuarial cost method is zero or less than zero on an actuarial
valuation date, then all prior unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities
-7-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
shall be considered fully funded and the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability shall be reinitialized and amortized over a twenty-five-year
period as of the actuarial valuation date; and
(iv) If the actuarially required contribution rate exceeds the rate
of all contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act,
there shall be a supplemental appropriation sufficient to pay for the
differences between the actuarially required contribution rate and the
rate of all contributions required pursuant to the act.
(b) (c) Upon the recommendation of the actuary to the board, and
after the board notifies the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the
Legislature, the board may combine or offset certain amortization bases
to reduce future volatility of the actuarial contribution rate. Such
notification to the committee shall be in writing and include, at a
minimum, the actuary's projection of the contributions to fund the plan
if the combination or offset were not implemented, the actuary's
projection of the contributions to fund the plan if the combination or
offset were implemented, and the actuary's explanation of why the
combination or offset is in the best interests of the plan at the
proposed time.
(c) (d) For purposes of this subsection, the rate of all
contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act includes (i)
member contributions, (ii) state contributions pursuant to subsection (6)
of this section which shall be considered as a contribution for the plan
year ending the prior June 30, (iii) court fees as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, and (iv) all fees pursuant to sections 25-2804,
33-103, 33-103.01, 33-106.02, 33-123, 33-124, 33-125, 33-126.02,
33-126.03, and 33-126.06, as directed to be remitted to the fund.
(6)(a) In addition to the contributions otherwise required by this
section, beginning July 1, 2023, and on July 1 of each year thereafter,
or as soon thereafter as administratively possible, the State Treasurer
shall transfer from the General Fund to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for
-8-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
Judges an amount equal to five percent of the total annual compensation
of all members of the retirement system except as otherwise provided in
this subsection and as such rate shall be adjusted or terminated by the
Legislature. No adjustment may cause the total contribution rate
established in this subsection to exceed five percent. For purposes of
this subsection, (i) total annual compensation is based on the total
member compensation reported in the most recent annual actuarial
valuation report for the retirement system produced for the board
pursuant to section 84-1503 and (ii) the contribution described in this
subsection shall be considered as a contribution for the plan year ending
the prior June 30.
(b) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets is at or
above one hundred percent for two consecutive years as reported in the
annual actuarial valuation report, the actuary shall assess whether the
percentage of the state contribution rate should be adjusted based on
projected annual actuarial valuation report results including the funded
ratio, actuarial contribution, and expected revenue sources using several
assumed investment return scenarios that the actuary deems to be
reasonable, and shall make a recommendation to the board as part of the
annual actuarial valuation report.
(c) If the state contribution rate has been adjusted to less than
five percent and the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets is
below one hundred percent for two consecutive years as reported in the
annual actuarial valuation report, the actuary shall assess whether the
percentage of the state contribution rate should be adjusted based on
projected annual actuarial valuation report results including the funded
ratio, actuarial contribution, and expected revenue sources using several
assumed investment return scenarios that the actuary deems to be
reasonable, and shall make a recommendation to the board as part of the
annual actuarial valuation report.
(d) If an annual actuarial valuation report includes a
-9-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
recommendation from the actuary to adjust the contribution rate as
described in subdivision (b) or (c) of this subsection, the board shall
provide written notice electronically to the Nebraska Retirement Systems
Committee of the Legislature, to the Governor, and to the Supreme Court
of such recommendation within seven business days after voting to approve
an annual actuarial valuation report. The notice shall include the
actuary's recommendation and analysis regarding such adjustment.
(e) Following receipt of the actuary's recommendation and analysis
pursuant to this subsection, the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of
the Legislature shall determine the amount of any adjustment of the
contribution rate and, if necessary, shall propose any such adjustment to
the Legislature.
(7) The state or county shall pick up the member contributions
required by this section for all compensation paid on or after January 1,
1985, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer
contributions pursuant to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
in determining federal tax treatment under the code and shall not be
included as gross income of the member until such time as they are
distributed or made available. The contributions, although designated as
member contributions, shall be paid by the state or county in lieu of
member contributions. The state or county shall pay these member
contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying
earnings to the member. The state or county shall pick up these
contributions by a compensation deduction through a reduction in the
compensation of the member. Member contributions picked up shall be
treated for all purposes of the Judges Retirement Act in the same manner
and to the extent as member contributions made prior to the date picked
up.
Sec. 3. Section 25-1140.09, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-1140.09 (1) On the application of the county attorney or any
-10-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
party to a suit in which a record of the proceedings has been made, upon
receipt of the notice provided in section 29-2525, or upon the filing of
a praecipe for a bill of exceptions by an appealing party in the office
of the clerk of the district court as provided in section 25-1140, the
court reporter shall prepare a transcribed copy of the proceedings so
recorded or any part thereof. The reporter shall be entitled to receive,
in addition to his or her salary, a per-page fee as prescribed by the
Supreme Court for the original copy and each additional copy, to be paid
by the party requesting the same except as otherwise provided in this
section.
(2) When the transcribed copy of the proceedings is required by the
county attorney, the fee therefor shall be paid by the county in the same
manner as other claims are paid. When the defendant in a criminal case,
after conviction, makes an affidavit that he or she is unable by reason
of his or her poverty to pay for such copy, the court or judge thereof
may, by order endorsed on such affidavit, direct delivery of such
transcribed copy to such defendant, and the fee shall be paid by the
county in the same manner as other claims are allowed and paid. When such
copy is prepared in any criminal case in which the sentence adjudged is
capital, the fees therefor shall be paid by the county in the same manner
as other claims are allowed or paid.
(3) The fee for preparation of a bill of exceptions and the
procedure for preparation, settlement, signature, allowance,
certification, filing, and amendment of a bill of exceptions shall be
regulated and governed by rules of practice prescribed by the Supreme
Court. The fee paid shall be taxed, by the clerk of the district court,
to the party against whom the judgment or decree is rendered except as
otherwise ordered by the presiding district judge.
(4) Fees under this section shall not be charged for any individual
described in section 1 of this act. In such case the fees shall be paid
by the county in the same manner as other claims are allowed or paid.
-11-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Section 25-1914, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1914 (1) On appeal in any case taken from the district court to
the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, other than an appeal pursuant to
section 71-6904, the appellant or appellants shall, within thirty days
after the entry of the judgment, decree, or final order sought to be
reversed, vacated, or modified or within thirty days after the entry of
the order overruling a motion for a new trial in such cause, (a) (1) file
in the district court a bond or undertaking in the sum of seventy-five
dollars to be approved by the clerk of the district court, conditioned
that the appellant shall pay all costs adjudged against him or her in the
appellate court, or (b) (2) make a cash deposit with the clerk of at
least seventy-five dollars for the same purpose. If a supersedeas bond is
executed, no bond for costs shall be required. The giving of either form
of bond or the making of such deposit shall be certified to by the clerk
of the district court in the transcript for the appellate court. The
appeal may be dismissed on motion and notice in the appellate court if no
bond has been given and certified in the transcript or within such
additional time as may be fixed by the appellate court for good cause
shown.
(2) This section does not apply to an individual described in
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. Section 25-3010, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-3010 A Beginning January 1, 2007, a fee of one dollar shall be
taxed as costs in each criminal proceeding, including traffic infractions
and misdemeanors, filed in all courts of this state for violations of
state law or city or village ordinances. No such fee shall be collected
in any juvenile court proceeding, or when waived under section 29-2709,
or from an individual described in section 1 of this act. Such fee shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State
-12-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
Treasurer within ten days after the close of each calendar quarter. The
State Treasurer shall credit the money to the Civil Legal Services Fund.
Sec. 6. Section 29-1903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1903 (1) The amount of the witness fee and mileage in traffic,
criminal, and juvenile cases is governed by section 33-139.
(2) A witness in a traffic, criminal, or juvenile case shall be
entitled to a witness fee and mileage after appearing in court in
response to a subpoena. The clerk of the court shall immediately submit a
claim for payment of witness fees and mileage on behalf of all such
witnesses to the county clerk in cases involving a violation of state law
or to the city clerk in cases involving a violation of a city ordinance.
All witness fees and mileage paid by a defendant as part of the court
costs ordered by the court to be paid shall be reimbursed to the county
or city treasurer as appropriate.
(3) Any person accused of crime amounting to a misdemeanor or felony
shall have compulsory process to enforce the attendance of witnesses in
his or her behalf.
(4) No costs or fees under this section shall be assessed against an
individual described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 7. Section 29-1920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-1920 The Whenever a defendant is adjudged indigent, the
reasonable costs incurred in the operation of the provisions of sections
29-1912 to 29-1921 shall be taxed as costs against the prosecuting
authority whenever: .
(1) The defendant is adjudged indigent; or
(2) Section 1 of this act applies.
Sec. 8. Section 29-2207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2207 Except as provided in section 1 of this act, in In every
-13-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
case of conviction of any person for any felony or misdemeanor, it shall
be the duty of the court or magistrate to render judgment for the costs
of prosecution against the person convicted and remit the assessment as
provided in section 33-157.
Sec. 9. Section 29-2262, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2262 (1) When a court sentences an offender to probation, it
shall attach such reasonable conditions as it deems necessary or likely
to insure that the offender will lead a law-abiding life. No offender
shall be sentenced to probation if he or she is deemed to be a habitual
criminal pursuant to section 29-2221.
(2) The court may, as a condition of a sentence of probation,
require the offender:
(a) To refrain from unlawful conduct;
(b) To be confined periodically in the county jail or to return to
custody after specified hours but not to exceed the lesser of ninety days
or the maximum jail term provided by law for the offense;
(c) To meet his or her family responsibilities;
(d) To devote himself or herself to a specific employment or
occupation;
(e) To undergo medical or psychiatric treatment and to enter and
remain in a specified institution for such purpose;
(f) To pursue a prescribed secular course of study or vocational
training;
(g) To attend or reside in a facility established for the
instruction, recreation, or residence of persons on probation;
(h) To refrain from frequenting unlawful or disreputable places or
consorting with disreputable persons;
(i) To possess no firearm or other dangerous weapon if convicted of
a felony, or if convicted of any other offense, to possess no firearm or
other dangerous weapon unless granted written permission by the court;
-14-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(j) To remain within the jurisdiction of the court and to notify the
court or the probation officer of any change in his or her address or his
or her employment and to agree to waive extradition if found in another
jurisdiction;
(k) To report as directed to the court or a probation officer and to
permit the officer to visit his or her home;
(l) To pay a fine in one or more payments as ordered;
(m) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, to To pay
for tests to determine the presence of drugs or alcohol, psychological
evaluations, offender assessment screens, and rehabilitative services
required in the identification, evaluation, and treatment of offenders if
such offender has the financial ability to pay for such services;
(n) To perform community service as outlined in sections 29-2277 to
29-2279 under the direction of his or her probation officer;
(o) To be monitored by an electronic surveillance device or system
and, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, to pay the
cost of such device or system if the offender has the financial ability;
(p) To participate in a community correctional facility or program
as provided in the Community Corrections Act;
(q) To satisfy any other conditions reasonably related to the
rehabilitation of the offender;
(r) To make restitution as described in sections 29-2280 and
29-2281; or
(s) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, to To pay
for all costs imposed by the court, including court costs and the fees
imposed pursuant to section 29-2262.06.
(3) When jail time is imposed as a condition of probation under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section, the court shall advise the offender
on the record the time the offender will serve in jail assuming no good
time for which the offender will be eligible under section 47-502 is lost
and assuming none of the jail time imposed as a condition of probation is
-15-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
waived by the court.
(4) Jail time may only be imposed as a condition of probation under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section if:
(a) The court would otherwise sentence the defendant to a term of
imprisonment instead of probation; and
(b) The court makes a finding on the record that, while probation is
appropriate, periodic confinement in the county jail as a condition of
probation is necessary because a sentence of probation without a period
of confinement would depreciate the seriousness of the offender's crime
or promote disrespect for law.
(5) In all cases in which the offender is guilty of violating
section 28-416, a condition of probation shall be mandatory treatment and
counseling as provided by such section.
(6) In all cases in which the offender is guilty of a crime covered
by the DNA Identification Information Act, a condition of probation shall
be the collecting of a DNA sample pursuant to the act and, except as
provided in subsection (8) of this section, the paying of all costs
associated with the collection of the DNA sample prior to release from
probation.
(7) For any offender sentenced to probation, the court shall enter
an order to provide the offender's (a) name, (b) probation officer, and
(c) conditions of probation to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice which shall provide access to such information to
law enforcement agencies through the state's criminal justice information
system.
(8) An individual described in section 1 of this act shall not be
required to pay any costs or fees as a condition of probation.
Sec. 10. Section 29-2262.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2262.04 Selected offenders in intensive supervision probation
programs shall receive the highest level of supervision that is provided
-16-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
to probationers. Such programs may include, but shall not be limited to,
highly restricted activities, daily contact between the offender and the
probation officer, monitored curfew, home visitation, employment
visitation and monitoring, drug and alcohol screening, treatment
referrals and monitoring, and restitution and community service. Except
as provided in section 1 of this act, selected Selected offenders
monitored by an electronic device or system shall be required to pay the
cost of such a device or system if the offender has the financial
ability. It is the intent of the Legislature that such programs shall
minimize any risk to the public.
Sec. 11. Section 29-2262.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2262.06 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
whenever a district court or county court sentences an adult offender to
probation, the court shall require the probationer to pay a one-time
administrative enrollment fee and thereafter a monthly probation
programming fee. An individual described in section 1 of this act shall
not be required to pay any fees under this section. No court or
governmental entity shall charge such an individual any local fee for
participation in a non-probation-based program or service.
(2) Participants in non-probation-based programs or services in
which probation personnel or probation resources are utilized pursuant to
an interlocal agreement authorized by subdivision (16) of section 29-2252
and in which all or a portion of the costs of such probation personnel or
such probation resources are covered by funds provided pursuant to
section 29-2262.07 shall pay the one-time administrative enrollment fee
described in subdivision (3)(a) of this section and the monthly probation
programming fee described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section. In
addition, the provisions of subsections (4), (7), and (10) of this
section applicable to probationers apply to participants in non-
probation-based programs or services. Any participant in a non-probation-
-17-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
based program or service who defaults on the payment of any such fees
may, at the discretion of the court, be subject to removal from such non-
probation-based program or service. This subdivision does not preclude a
court or other governmental entity from charging additional local fees
for participation in such non-probation-based programs and services or
other similar non-probation-based programs and services.
(3) The court shall establish the administrative enrollment fee and
monthly probation programming fees as follows:
(a) Adult probationers placed on either probation or intensive
supervision probation and participants in non-probation-based programs or
services shall pay a one-time administrative enrollment fee of thirty
dollars. The fee shall be paid in a lump sum upon the beginning of
probation supervision or participation in a non-probation-based program
or service;
(b) Adult probationers placed on probation shall pay a monthly
probation programming fee of twenty-five dollars, not later than the
tenth day of each month, for the duration of probation; and
(c) Adult probationers placed on intensive supervision probation and
participants in non-probation-based programs or services shall pay a
monthly probation programming fee of thirty-five dollars, not later than
the tenth day of each month, for the duration of probation or
participation in a non-probation-based program or service.
(4) The court shall waive payment of the monthly probation
programming fees in whole or in part if after a hearing a determination
is made that such payment would constitute an undue hardship on the
offender due to limited income, employment or school status, or physical
or mental handicap. Such waiver shall be in effect only during the period
of time that the probationer or participant in a non-probation-based
program or service is unable to pay his or her monthly probation
programming fee.
(5) If a probationer defaults in the payment of monthly probation
-18-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
programming fees or any installment thereof, the court may revoke his or
her probation for nonpayment, except that probation shall not be revoked
nor shall the offender be imprisoned for such nonpayment if the
probationer is financially unable to make the payment, if he or she so
states to the court in writing under oath, and if the court so finds
after a hearing.
(6) If the court determines that the default in payment described in
subsection (5) of this section was not attributable to a deliberate
refusal to obey the order of the court or to failure on the probationer's
part to make a good faith effort to obtain the funds required for
payment, the court may enter an order allowing the probationer additional
time for payment, reducing the amount of each installment, or revoking
the fees or the unpaid portion in whole or in part.
(7) No probationer or participant in a non-probation-based program
or service shall be required to pay more than one monthly probation
programming fee per month. This subsection does not preclude local fees
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(8) The imposition of monthly probation programming fees in this
section shall be considered separate and apart from the fees described in
subdivisions (2)(m) and (o) of section 29-2262.
(9) Any adult probationer received for supervision pursuant to
section 29-2637 or the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision
shall be assessed both a one-time administrative enrollment fee and
monthly probation programming fees during the period of time the
probationer is actively supervised by Nebraska probation authorities.
(10) The probationer or participant in a non-probation-based program
or service shall pay the fees described in this section to the clerk of
the court. The clerk of the court shall remit all fees so collected to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Probation Program Cash Fund.
Sec. 12. Section 29-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-19-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
29-2704 (1) Upon examination in county court on complaint of a
felony, whether the accused is held to answer in court or discharged, the
court may file with the county clerk a certified transcript of the costs
as assessed under section 29-2709, giving the items of the same, and to
whom each is due, and on what account. As early as may be after the
filing of such bill, but without assembling for the special purpose, the
county board of the proper county shall examine into such bill of costs
as to its correctness, justice, and legality and may, if need be, examine
under oath any person upon the subject, which oath may be administered by
the county clerk.
(2) It shall be the duty of the board to disallow any item, in whole
or in part, of such bill that is found to be unlawful or needlessly
incurred, or if it appears that the complaint was made for a felony when
it should have been for a misdemeanor only, it may in its discretion
disallow the entire bill or any part thereof.
(3) The board may order that such bill, or so much thereof as it
finds to be lawful and just, be paid from the county treasury, whereupon
the county clerk shall draw warrants upon the county treasurer for the
sums respectively due to each person upon such bill so allowed, which
warrants the treasurer shall pay from the county general fund. The amount
of costs so allowed shall be certified by the county clerk, and the
certificate filed with the papers in the cause, in the office of the
clerk of the district court. Except as provided in section 1 of this act,
if If the defendant shall be convicted, judgment shall be rendered
against him or her for the costs so allowed, in addition to the costs
made in the district court.
Sec. 13. Section 29-4106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-4106 (1) A person who is convicted of a felony offense or other
specified offense on or after July 15, 2010, who does not have a DNA
sample available for use in the State DNA Sample Bank, shall , at his or
-20-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
her own expense, have a DNA sample collected. Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, such sample shall be collected at such person's
expense. Such sample shall be collected:
(a) Upon intake to a prison, jail, or other detention facility or
institution to which such person is sentenced. If the person is already
confined at the time of sentencing, the person shall have a DNA sample
collected immediately after the sentencing. Such DNA sample shall be
collected at the place of incarceration or confinement. Such person shall
not be released unless and until a DNA sample has been collected; or
(b) As a condition for any sentence which will not involve an intake
into a prison, jail, or other detention facility or institution. Such DNA
samples shall be collected as follows:
(i) In any county containing a city of the metropolitan class, a
person placed on probation or who received a penalty of a fine or time
served shall have such DNA sample collected by a probation officer at a
probation office. Such person shall not be released unless and until a
DNA sample has been collected; and
(ii) In all other counties, a person placed on probation shall have
such DNA sample collected by a probation officer at a probation office,
and a person not placed on probation who receives a penalty of a fine or
time served shall have such DNA sample collected by the county sheriff.
Such person shall not be released unless and until a DNA sample has been
collected.
(2) A person who has been convicted of a felony offense or other
specified offense before July 15, 2010, who does not have a DNA sample
available for use in the State DNA Sample Bank, and who is still serving
a term of confinement or probation for such felony offense or other
specified offense on July 15, 2010, shall not be released prior to the
expiration of his or her maximum term of confinement or revocation or
discharge from his or her probation unless and until a DNA sample has
been collected.
-21-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(3) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, a A person who is
serving a term of probation and has a DNA sample collected pursuant to
this section shall pay all costs associated with the collection of the
DNA sample.
(4) If the court waives the cost of taking a DNA sample for any
reason, a county jail or other county detention facility or institution
collecting the DNA sample shall not be held financially responsible for
the cost of the DNA sample kit.
Sec. 14. Section 29-4121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-4121 Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the The cost of
DNA testing ordered under subsection (5) of section 29-4120 shall be paid
by the person filing the motion, unless the court determines such person
to be indigent. If the person filing such motion is determined by the
court to be indigent or is a person described in section 1 of this act,
the costs shall be paid by the state in the following manner:
(1) If the Commission on Public Advocacy has been appointed to
represent the person filing the motion, as determined under section
29-4122, the costs of testing shall be paid by the commission from funds
appropriated by the Legislature; and
(2) If the Commission on Public Advocacy has not been appointed to
represent the person filing the motion, the court shall hold a hearing to
determine the costs for DNA testing. The court shall order the commission
to pay such costs. The order shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court
to the commission, along with copies of all invoices for such DNA
testing. Upon receipt, the commission shall pay such costs from funds
appropriated by the Legislature.
Sec. 15. Section 33-103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-103 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) At the time of filing an appeal, original action, or other
-22-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
proceeding in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court there shall be paid
to the clerk the sum of one hundred dollars as a docket fee. Fifty
dollars of such fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges; and .
(b) The clerk shall charge fees for copies of documents and
certificates at the rate provided in section 25-1280.
(2) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 16. Section 33-106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
33-106 (1) No fee shall be charged under this section for an
individual described in section 1 of this act.
(2) (1) In addition to the judges' retirement fund fee provided in
section 24-703 and the fees provided in section 33-106.03 and except as
otherwise provided by law, the fees of the clerk of the district court
shall be as provided in this section. There shall be a docket fee of
forty-two dollars for each civil and criminal case except:
(a) There shall be a docket fee of twenty-five dollars for each case
commenced by filing a transcript of judgment from another court in this
state for the purpose of obtaining a lien;
(b) For proceedings under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and
the Employment Security Law, when provision is made for the fees that may
be charged; and
(c) There shall be a docket fee of twenty-seven dollars for each
criminal case appealed to the district court from any court inferior
thereto.
(3) (2) In all cases, other than those appealed from an inferior
court or original filings which are within jurisdictional limits of an
inferior court and when a jury is demanded in district court, the docket
fee shall cover all fees of the clerk, except that the clerk shall be
paid for each copy or transcript ordered of any pleading, record, or
-23-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
other document and that the clerk shall be entitled to a fee of fifteen
dollars for a records management fee which will be taxed as costs of the
case.
(4) (3) In all civil cases, except habeas corpus cases in which a
poverty affidavit is filed and approved by the court, and for all other
services, the docket fee or other fee shall be paid by the party filing
the case or requesting the service at the time the case is filed or the
service requested.
(5) (4) For any other service which may be rendered or performed by
the clerk but which is not required in the discharge of his or her
official duties, the fee shall be the same as that of a notary public but
in no case less than one dollar.
Sec. 17. Section 33-107.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-107.01 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A legal services fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents shall
be taxed as costs in each case filed in each separate juvenile court and
district court, including appeals to such courts, and on each case filed
in each county court except those filed in county court pursuant to its
jurisdiction under section 25-2802; and .
(b) A legal services fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents shall
be taxed as costs for each appeal and original action filed in the Court
of Appeals and the Supreme Court.
(2) Such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the close of each
month for credit to the Legal Aid and Services Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 18. Section 33-107.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-107.03 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
-24-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
in In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a
court automation fee of eight dollars shall be taxed as costs for each
case filed in each county court, separate juvenile court, and district
court, including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal and original
action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court.
(2) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each
month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Supreme Court
Automation Cash Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 19. Section 33-124, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
33-124 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in
In criminal matters, including preliminary and juvenile hearings, the
county court shall receive, for any and all services rendered up to and
including the judgment or dismissal of the action and the issuance of
mittimus or discharge to the jailer, a fee of twenty dollars.
(2) Of such twenty-dollar fee, twelve dollars the following amounts
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska
Retirement Fund for Judges. : (a) Six dollars through June 30, 2021, (b)
beginning July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, eight dollars, (c)
beginning July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023, nine dollars, (d)
beginning July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, ten dollars, (e) beginning
July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, eleven dollars, and (f) beginning
July 1, 2025, twelve dollars.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 20. Section 33-126.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-126.05 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
-25-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
the The county court shall be allowed the following miscellaneous fees:
For delayed birth registration, for the entire proceedings, ten dollars;
for depositing will for safekeeping and indexing the same, two dollars;
and for each use of any credit card authorized by the court for any
payment, a fee established in the manner provided in subsection (3) of
section 81-118.01. The legal fees for printing notices required by law to
be printed in some newspaper shall be allowed in addition to the fees
allowed in this section.
(2) For the following services performed by the county court, it
shall be entitled to receive the following fees: For temporary
restraining order in injunction, in the absence of the district judge,
five dollars; for appointment of appraisers in condemnation proceedings,
fifteen dollars, plus one dollar for each additional parcel of land
included in the petition when there is more than one; and for certifying
report of appraisers to the county clerk or register of deeds and making
transcript of the same to the district court, one dollar per page.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, in In
addition to the fees provided in sections 33-123 to 33-125, the county
court shall be entitled to the following fees: For providing photocopies,
twenty-five cents per page; and for executing certificate and affixing
the seal, one dollar.
(4) No fee shall be charged under subsection (1) or (3) of this
section for an individual described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 21. Section 33-154, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-154 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in
In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a
training fee of one dollar shall be taxed as costs for each case filed in
each county court and district court, including appeals to such courts,
and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and
the Supreme Court.
-26-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(2) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each
month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Supreme Court
Education Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 22. Section 33-155, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-155 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in
In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a dispute
resolution fee of seventy-five cents shall be taxed as costs for each
case filed in each county court and district court, including appeals to
such courts, and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court
of Appeals and the Supreme Court.
(2) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each
month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Dispute
Resolution Cash Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 23. Section 33-156, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-156 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
in (1) In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, an
indigent defense fee of three dollars shall be taxed as costs for each
case filed in each county court and district court, including appeals to
such courts, and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court
of Appeals and the Supreme Court.
(b) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of the
month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Commission on
-27-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund.
(2) In cases under the DNA Testing Act, costs shall be paid as
provided in such act.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 24. Section 33-157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-157 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
in (1) In addition to all other costs assessed according to law, an
assessment of one dollar shall be assessed for each conviction of a
person for any misdemeanor or felony in county court or district court
and each affirmation on appeal. No such assessment shall be collected in
any juvenile court proceeding. No county shall be liable for the
assessment imposed pursuant to this section.
(b) The assessments shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on
forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of
the month.
(2) The Nebraska Crime Victim Fund is created. The fund shall
contain the amounts remitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
and section 83-184. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. As soon as funds
become available, the commission shall direct the State Treasurer to
transfer money from the Nebraska Crime Victim Fund to the Department of
Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund and the Supreme Court Automation
Cash Fund to pay for the initial costs in implementing Laws 2010, LB510,
in amounts to be determined by the Department of Correctional Services
and the Supreme Court and certified to the commission. When such costs
are fully reimbursed, the Nebraska Crime Victim Fund shall terminate and
the State Treasurer shall distribute seventy-five percent of the funds
remitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and section 83-184 to
the Victim's Compensation Fund to be awarded as compensation for losses
-28-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
and expenses allowable under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act
and shall distribute twenty-five percent of such funds to the Reentry
Cash Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 25. Section 43-254, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-254 (1) Pending the adjudication of any case, and subject to
subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01, if it appears that the need for
placement or further detention exists, the juvenile may be:
(a) Placed or detained a reasonable period of time on order of the
court in the temporary custody of either the person having charge of the
juvenile or some other suitable person;
(b) Kept in some suitable place provided by the city or county
authorities;
(c) Placed in any proper and accredited charitable institution;
(d) Placed in a state institution, except any adult correctional
facility, when proper facilities are available and the only local
facility is a city or county jail, at the expense of the committing
county on a per diem basis as determined from time to time by the head of
the particular institution;
(e) Placed in the temporary care and custody of the Department of
Health and Human Services when it does not appear that there is any need
for secure detention, except that no juvenile alleged to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 shall
be placed in the care and custody or under the supervision of the
department; or
(f) Offered supervision options as determined pursuant to section
43-260.01, through the Office of Probation Administration as ordered by
the court and agreed to in writing by the parties, if the juvenile is
alleged to be a juvenile described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or
-29-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(4) of section 43-247 and it does not appear that there is any need for
secure detention.
(2) For a juvenile alleged to be a juvenile described in subdivision
(4) of section 43-247, the The court may assess the cost of such
placement or detention in whole or in part to the parent of the juvenile
as provided in section 43-290.
(3) If a juvenile has been removed from his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 43-248, the court may
enter an order continuing detention or placement upon a written
determination that continuation of the juvenile in his or her home would
be contrary to the health, safety, or welfare of such juvenile and that
reasonable efforts were made to preserve and reunify the family if
required under section 43-283.01.
Sec. 26. Section 43-260.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-260.04 (1) A juvenile pretrial diversion program shall:
(a) (1) Be an option available for the county attorney or city
attorney based upon his or her determination under this subdivision. The
county attorney or city attorney may use the following information:
(i) (a) The juvenile's age;
(ii) (b) The nature of the offense and role of the juvenile in the
offense;
(iii) (c) The number and nature of previous offenses involving the
juvenile;
(iv) (d) The dangerousness or threat posed by the juvenile to
persons or property; or
(v) (e) The recommendations of the referring agency, victim, and
advocates for the juvenile;
(b) (2) Permit participation by a juvenile only on a voluntary basis
and shall include a juvenile diversion agreement described in section
43-260.06;
-30-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(c) (3) Allow the juvenile to consult with counsel prior to a
decision to participate in the program;
(d) (4) Be offered to the juvenile when practicable prior to the
filing of a juvenile petition or a criminal charge but after the arrest
of the juvenile or issuance of a citation to the juvenile if after the
arrest or citation a decision has been made by the county attorney or
city attorney that the offense will support the filing of a juvenile
petition or criminal charges;
(e) (5) Provide screening services for use in creating a diversion
plan utilizing appropriate services for the juvenile;
(f) (6) Result in dismissal of the juvenile petition or criminal
charges if the juvenile successfully completes the program;
(g) (7) Be designed and operated to further the goals stated in
section 43-260.03 and comply with sections 43-260.04 to 43-260.07; and
(h) (8) Require information received by the program regarding the
juvenile to remain confidential unless a release of information is signed
upon admission to the program or is otherwise authorized by law. ; and
(2)(a) A juvenile pretrial diversion program shall respond (9)(a)
Respond to a public inquiry in the same manner as if there were no
information or records concerning participation in the diversion program.
Information or records pertaining to participation in the diversion
program shall not be disseminated to any person other than:
(i) A criminal justice agency as defined in section 29-3509;
(ii) The individual who is the subject of the record or any persons
authorized by such individual; or
(iii) Other persons or agencies authorized by law.
(b) An individual, a person, or an agency requesting information
subject to subdivision (2)(a) (9)(a) of this section shall provide the
diversion program with satisfactory verification of his, her, or its
identity.
(3) A juvenile pretrial diversion program shall not require payment
-31-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
of program fines or fees as a condition of participation in or completion
of such program. The ability of a juvenile or the juvenile's parent or
guardian to pay any fee or fine shall not be considered in determining
whether to offer participation in such program. Failure to pay a fine or
fee shall not prevent a juvenile's records from being sealed.
Sec. 27. Section 43-261, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-261 (1)(a) A juvenile court petition and all subsequent
proceedings shall be entitled In the Interest
of ........................., a Juvenile, inserting the juvenile's name
in the blank. The written petition shall be signed by the county
attorney, specify which subdivision of section 43-247 is alleged and set
forth the facts, state the juvenile's month and year of birth, and
request the juvenile court to determine whether support will be ordered
pursuant to section 43-290. An allegation under subdivision (1), (2), or
(4) of section 43-247 is to be made with the same specificity as a
criminal complaint. It is sufficient if the petition is based upon
information and belief.
(b) A juvenile court petition is filed with the clerk of the court
having jurisdiction over the matter. If such court is a separate juvenile
court, the petition is filed with the clerk of the district court. If
such court is a county court sitting as a juvenile court, the petition is
filed with the clerk of the county court.
(2) In all cases involving violation of a city or village ordinance,
the city attorney or village prosecutor may file a petition in juvenile
court. If such a petition is filed, for purposes of such proceeding,
references in the Nebraska Juvenile Code to county attorney are construed
to include a city attorney or village prosecutor.
(3) Any fees to cover costs associated with filing a petition
alleging a juvenile to be within subdivision (1), (2), or (3)(b) of
section 43-247 shall not be assessed against the juvenile or the
-32-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
juvenile's parent or guardian.
Sec. 28. Section 43-272, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-272 (1)(a) In counties having a population of less than one
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants:
(i) When any juvenile court petition is filed alleging jurisdiction
of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 43-247, counsel
shall be appointed for such juvenile; and
(ii) In any other instance in which a juvenile is brought without
counsel before a juvenile court, the court shall advise such juvenile and
his or her parent or guardian of their right to retain counsel and shall
inquire of such juvenile and his or her parent or guardian as to whether
they desire to retain counsel.
(b) In counties having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or
more inhabitants, when any juvenile court petition is filed alleging
jurisdiction of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or
(4) of section 43-247, counsel shall be appointed for such juvenile.
(c) The court shall inform any juvenile described in this subsection
and his or her parent or guardian of such juvenile's right to counsel at
county expense if none of them is able to afford counsel. If the juvenile
or his or her parent or guardian desires to have counsel appointed for
such juvenile, or the parent or guardian of such juvenile cannot be
located, and the court ascertains that none of such persons are able to
afford an attorney, the court shall forthwith appoint an attorney to
represent such juvenile for all proceedings before the juvenile court. ,
except that if an attorney is appointed to represent such juvenile and
the court later determines that a parent of such juvenile is able to
afford an attorney, the court shall order such parent or juvenile to pay
for services of the attorney to be collected in the same manner as
provided by section 43-290. If the parent willfully refuses to pay any
such sum, the court may commit him or her for contempt, and execution may
-33-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
issue at the request of the appointed attorney or the county attorney or
by the court without a request.
(2) The court, on its own motion or upon application of a party to
the proceedings, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the juvenile: (a)
If the juvenile has no parent or guardian of his or her person or if the
parent or guardian of the juvenile cannot be located or cannot be brought
before the court; (b) if the parent or guardian of the juvenile is
excused from participation in all or any part of the proceedings; (c) if
the parent is a juvenile or an incompetent; (d) if the parent is
indifferent to the interests of the juvenile; or (e) in any proceeding
pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247.
A guardian ad litem shall have the duty to protect the interests of
the juvenile for whom he or she has been appointed guardian, and shall be
deemed a parent of the juvenile as to those proceedings with respect to
which his or her guardianship extends.
(3) The court shall appoint an attorney as guardian ad litem. A
guardian ad litem shall act as his or her own counsel and as counsel for
the juvenile, unless there are special reasons in a particular case why
the guardian ad litem or the juvenile or both should have separate
counsel. In such cases the guardian ad litem shall have the right to
counsel, except that the guardian ad litem shall be entitled to appointed
counsel without regard to his or her financial ability to retain counsel.
Whether such appointed counsel shall be provided at the cost of the
county shall be determined as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The By July 1, 2015, the Supreme Court shall provide by court
rule standards for guardians ad litem for juveniles in juvenile court
proceedings.
(5) The By July 1, 2017, the Supreme Court shall provide guidelines
setting forth standards for all attorneys who practice in juvenile court.
Sec. 29. Section 43-290, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-34-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
43-290 (1) It is the purpose of this section to promote parental
responsibility and to provide for the most equitable use and availability
of public money.
(2) Pursuant to a petition filed by a county attorney or city
attorney having knowledge of a juvenile in his or her jurisdiction who
appears to be a juvenile described in subdivision (3)(a), (3)(c) (1),
(2), (3), or (4) of section 43-247, whenever the care or custody of a
juvenile is given by the court to someone other than his or her parent,
which shall include placement with a state agency, or when a juvenile is
given medical, psychological, or psychiatric study or treatment under
order of the court, the court shall make a determination of support to be
paid by a parent for the juvenile at the same proceeding at which
placement, study, or treatment is determined or at a separate proceeding.
Such proceeding, which may occur prior to, at the same time as, or
subsequent to adjudication, shall be in the nature of a disposition
hearing.
(3) At such proceeding, after summons to the parent of the time and
place of hearing served as provided in sections 43-262 to 43-267, the
court may order and decree that the parent shall pay, in such manner as
the court may direct, a reasonable sum that will cover in whole or part
the support, study, and treatment of the juvenile, which amount ordered
paid shall be the extent of the liability of the parent. The court in
making such order shall give due regard to the cost of the support,
study, and treatment of the juvenile, the ability of the parent to pay,
and the availability of money for the support of the juvenile from
previous judicial decrees, social security benefits, veterans benefits,
or other sources. Support thus received by the court shall be transmitted
to the person, agency, or institution having financial responsibility for
such support, study, or treatment and, if a state agency or institution,
remitted by such state agency or institution quarterly to the Director of
Administrative Services for credit to the proper fund.
-35-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
(4) Whenever medical, psychological, or psychiatric study or
treatment is ordered by the court, whether or not the juvenile is placed
with someone other than his or her parent, or if such study or treatment
is otherwise provided as determined necessary by the custodian of the
juvenile, the court shall inquire as to the availability of insured or
uninsured health care coverage or service plans which include the
juvenile. The court may order the parent to pay over any plan benefit
sums received on coverage for the juvenile. The payment of any deductible
under the health care benefit plan covering the juvenile shall be the
responsibility of the parent. If the parent willfully fails or refuses to
pay the sum ordered or to pay over any health care plan benefit sums
received, the court may proceed against him or her as for contempt,
either on the court's own motion or on the motion of the county attorney
or authorized attorney as provided in section 43-512, or execution shall
issue at the request of any person, agency, or institution treating or
maintaining such juvenile. The court may afterwards, because of a change
in the circumstances of the parties, revise or alter the order of payment
for support, study, or treatment.
(5) If the juvenile has been committed to the care and custody of
the Department of Health and Human Services, the department shall pay the
costs for the support, study, or treatment of the juvenile which are not
otherwise paid by the juvenile's parent.
(6) If no provision is otherwise made by law for the support or
payment for the study or treatment of the juvenile, compensation for the
support, study, or treatment shall be paid, when approved by an order of
the court, out of a fund which shall be appropriated by the county in
which the petition is filed.
(7) The juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction over a parent
ordered to pay support for the purpose of enforcing such support order
for so long as such support remains unpaid but not to exceed ten years
from the nineteenth birthday of the youngest child for whom support was
-36-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
ordered.
(8) The court shall not assess any costs described in this section
against a juvenile or the juvenile's parent or guardian in any case filed
under subdivision (1), (2), or (3)(b) of section 43-247. However, the
court may inquire as to the availability of insured or uninsured health
care coverage or service plans which include the juvenile. If such
coverage or plans are in effect, the court may order the parent or
guardian to continue paying any deductible for such coverage or plan.
Sec. 30. No fine shall be imposed against a juvenile or parent or
guardian of a juvenile in any proceeding under the Nebraska Juvenile
Code.
Sec. 31. Section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,129 Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 and section 30 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 32. Section 47-633, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-633 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in
In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a uniform
data analysis fee of one dollar shall be taxed as costs for each case
filed in each county court, separate juvenile court, and district court,
including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal and original action
filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court.
(2) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each
month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Community
Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for an individual
described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 33. Section 81-1429, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-37-

LB65 LB65
2025 2025
81-1429 A Law Enforcement Improvement Fund fee of two dollars shall
be taxed as costs in each criminal proceeding, including traffic
infractions and misdemeanors, filed in all courts of this state for
violations of state law or city or village ordinances. No such fee shall
be collected in any juvenile court proceeding, or when waived under
section 29-2709, or from any individual described in section 1 of this
act. Such fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the close of each
calendar quarter. The State Treasurer shall credit the money to the Law
Enforcement Improvement Fund.
Sec. 34. Original sections 25-1914, 25-3010, 29-1920, 29-2207,
29-2262.04, 29-2262.06, 29-2704, 29-4106, 29-4121, 33-103, 33-107.01,
33-107.03, 33-126.05, 33-154, 33-155, 33-156, 33-157, 43-261, 43-290,
47-633, and 81-1429, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
24-703, 25-1140.09, 29-1903, 29-2262, 33-106, 33-124, 43-254, 43-260.04,
43-272, and 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-38-